Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.100

Nonresident auctioneers and auction companies.

(1) Nonresident auctioneers and auction companies are required to comply with the provisions of this chapter, chapter 18.235 RCW, and the rules of the department as a condition of conducting business in the state.

(2) The application of a nonresident under this chapter shall constitute the appointment of the secretary of state as the applicant's agent upon whom process may be served in any action or proceeding against the applicant arising out of a transaction or operation connected with or incidental to the business of an auctioneer or an auction company.

[ 2002 c 86 s 208; 1986 c 324 s 7; 1985 c 7 s 9; 1982 c 205 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.